Tennessee statutes. Title 66 Property
Part 2

Uniform Real Property Electronic Recording Act

66-24-201. Short title.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the “Uniform Real Property Electronic Recording Act.”

Acts 2007, ch. 420, § 2.

66-24-202. Part definitions.

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Digitized image” means an electronic document that is created as an electronic copy of a paper document that accurately depicts the information on the paper document and is unalterable;

“Document” means information that is:

Inscribed on a tangible medium or that is stored in an electronic or other medium and is retrievable in perceivable form; and

Eligible to be recorded in the land records maintained by the county register;

“Electronic” means relating to technology having electrical, digital, magnetic, wireless, optical, electromagnetic, or similar capabilities;

“Electronic document” means a document that is received by the county register in an electronic form;

“Electronic signature” means an electronic sound, symbol, or process attached to or logically associated with a document and executed or adopted by a person with the intent to sign the document;

“Paper document” means a document that is received by the county register of deeds in a form that is not electronic;

“Person” means an individual, corporation, business trust, estate, trust, partnership, limited liability company, association, joint venture, public corporation, government, or governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality, or any other legal or commercial entity;

“State” means a state of the United States, the District of Columbia, Puerto Rico, the United States Virgin Islands, or any territory or insular possession subject to the jurisdiction of the United States; and

“Wet Signature” means a signature affixed in ink or pencil or other material to a paper document.

Acts 2007, ch. 420, § 2.

66-24-203. Validity of electronic documents.

If a law requires, as a condition for recording, that a document be an original, be on paper or another tangible medium, or be in writing, the requirement is satisfied by an electronic document satisfying this part.

If a law requires, as a condition for recording, that a document be signed, the requirement is satisfied by an electronic signature or a digitized image of a wet signature.

A requirement that a document or a signature associated with a document be notarized, acknowledged, verified, witnessed, or made under oath is satisfied if the electronic signature or a digitized image of a wet signature of the person authorized to perform that act, and all other information required to be included, is attached to or logically associated with the document or signature. A physical or electronic image of a stamp, impression, or seal need not accompany an electronic signature.

A county register may receive for registration any electronic document that is created by making a digitized image of an original paper document that is eligible for registration, and beginning July 1, 2007, has the certification required by § 66-24-101(d).

All recordings of electronic documents eligible for registration pursuant to this subsection (d) are validly registered when accepted for recording by the county register. Electronic documents registered by county registers prior to July 1, 2007, shall be considered validly registered.

Acts 2007, ch. 420, § 2.

66-24-204. Authority of county register.

A county register:

Who implements any of the functions listed in this section shall do so in compliance with standards established by the information systems council established under § 4-3-5501;

May receive, index, store, archive, and transmit electronic documents;

May provide for access to, and for search and retrieval of, documents and information by electronic means;

Who accepts electronic documents for recording shall continue to accept paper documents as authorized by state law and shall place entries for both types of documents in the same index;

May convert paper documents accepted for recording into electronic form;

May convert into electronic form information recorded before the county register began to record electronic documents;

May accept electronically any fee or tax that the county register is authorized to collect;

May agree with other officials of a state or a political subdivision of a state, or of the United States, on procedures or processes to facilitate the electronic satisfaction of prior approvals and conditions precedent to recording and the electronic payment of fees and taxes; and

May refuse to record any document transmitted electronically to the county register for recording under this part on and after July 1, 2007, that does not comply with § 66-24-101.

Any electronic documents or digitized images accepted by the county register prior to July 1, 2007, are deemed to be recorded properly and to impart constructive notice.

Acts 2007, ch. 420, § 2.

66-24-205. Administration and standards.

The information systems council shall adopt standards to implement this part.

To keep the standards and practices of county registers in this state in harmony with the standards and practices of recording offices in other jurisdictions that enact substantially this part and to keep the technology used by county registers in this state compatible with technology used by recording offices in other jurisdictions that enact substantially this part, the information systems council so far as is consistent with the purposes, policies, and provisions of this part, in adopting, amending, and repealing standards shall consider:

Standards and practices of other jurisdictions;

The most recent standards promulgated by national standard-setting bodies, such as the Property Records Industry Association;

The views of interested persons and governmental officials and entities;

The needs of counties of varying size, population, and resources; and

Standards requiring adequate information security protection to ensure that electronic documents are accurate, authentic, adequately preserved, and resistant to tampering.

Acts 2007, ch. 420, § 2.

66-24-206. County registers not required to receive electronic documents.

Nothing in this part, or any other law, shall be construed to require county registers to receive a document electronically.

Acts 2007, ch. 420, § 2.